dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="शोध/णे__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>णे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ाल</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तं</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तं</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तं</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ताना</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायचा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायचे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ण्याची</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>लास</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>    
   </pardef>

    <e lm="करणे"><i>कर</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कापणे"><i>काप</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खेळणे"><i>खेळ</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घालणे"><i>घाल</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिसणे"><i>दिस</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मागणे"><i>माग</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लपणे"><i>लप</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="विचारणे"><i>विचार</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="शकणे"><i>शक</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="शोधणे"><i>शोध</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="होणे"><i>हो</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
